Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Article 1. Mississippi Ethics Commission.

§ 25-4-1.
Legislative purpose.

The Legislature hereby declares it essential to the proper operation of democratic government that public officials and employees be independent and impartial; that governmental decisions and policy be made in the proper channels of the governmental structure; that public office not be used for private gain other than the remuneration provided by law; that there be public confidence in the integrity of government; and that public officials be assisted in determinations of conflicts of interest.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 508, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 488, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 348, § 1, reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 491, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 360, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 350, § 1, eff from and after June 8, 1998 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the reenactment of this section).

§ 25-4-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Advisory boards or commissions” means committees created solely to provide technical or professional knowledge or expertise to a parent organization, and whose members exercise no direct authority to expend public funds other than reimbursement for personal expenses incurred as a result of a member’s service on the advisory board;

“Business” means any corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, firm, enterprise, franchise, association, organization, holding company, self-employed individual, joint-stock company, receivership, trust or other legal entity or undertaking organized for economic gain or a nonprofit corporation or other such entity, association or organization receiving public funds;

“Candidate for public office” means an individual who has filed the necessary documents or papers to appear as a candidate for nomination for election or election to any elective office existing under the laws of the State of Mississippi, including primary, special or general elections. The term “candidate” does not include any person within the meaning of Section 301(b) of the Federal Election Campaign Act of 1971;

“Commission” means the Mississippi Ethics Commission;

“Compensation” means money or thing of value received, or to be received, from any person for services rendered or to be rendered;

“Household member” means:

The spouse of the public servant; or

Any person over the age of twenty-one (21) who resided in the public servant’s household during the entire reporting period.

“Income” means money or thing of value received, or to be received, from any source, including, but not limited to, any salary, wage, advance, payment, dividend, interest, rent, forgiveness of debt, fee, royalty or any combination thereof;

“Person” means any individual, firm, business, corporation, association, partnership, union or other legal entity;

“Public employee” means any individual who receives a salary, per diem or expenses paid in whole or in part out of funds authorized to be expended by the Mississippi State Legislature or by the governing body of any political subdivision thereof, or any other body politic within the State of Mississippi;

“Public funds” means all monies, whether federal, state, district or local;

“Public official” means:

Any elected official of the State of Mississippi or any political subdivision thereof or any other body politic within the State of Mississippi; or

Any member, officer, director, commissioner, supervisor, chief, head, agent or employee of the State of Mississippi, or any agency thereof, of any political subdivision of the State of Mississippi, of any body politic within the State of Mississippi, or of any public entity created by or under the laws of the State of Mississippi or by executive order of the Governor of the state, any of which is funded by public funds or which expends, authorizes or recommends the use of public funds;

“Public servant” means:

Any elected or appointed official of the government;

Any officer, director, commissioner, supervisor, chief, head, agent or employee of the government or any agency thereof, or of any public entity created by or under the laws of the State of Mississippi or created by an agency or governmental entity thereof, any of which is funded by public funds or which expends, authorizes or recommends the use of public funds; or

Any individual who receives a salary, per diem or expenses paid in whole or in part out of funds authorized to be expended by the government.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 508, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1982, ch. 488, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 348, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 491, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 360, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 350, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 562, § 1, eff August 5, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 25-4-5.
Creation of commission; composition; appointment of members; terms of office; successors; appointment of member by Chief Justice of Supreme Court.

There is hereby created the Mississippi Ethics Commission which shall be composed of eight (8) members, each of whom shall be a qualified elector of the State of Mississippi, of good moral character and integrity.

Two (2) members of the commission shall be appointed by each of the following officers in strict accordance with the above standards: the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Chief Justice of the Mississippi Supreme Court. Not more than one (1) person appointed by each appointing authority shall be an elected official.

The members of the initial commission shall be appointed for terms of office expiring one (1), two (2), three (3) and four (4) years, respectively, from November 15, 1979, the members appointed by the Governor having a one-year term and a four-year term, the members appointed by the Lieutenant Governor having a two-year term and a three-year term, the members appointed by the Speaker having a three-year term and a two-year term, and the members appointed by the Chief Justice having a four-year term and a one-year term.

Successors to the members of the initial commission shall each be appointed for terms of four (4) years and until their successors are appointed and have been duly qualified.

If any of the above-listed appointing authorities should fail to make his appointment to the initial commission within forty-five (45) days after November 15, 1979, fail to fill a vacancy within forty-five (45) days after such vacancy occurs, or fail to make his appointment for a full term to the commission, then the Chief Justice of the Mississippi Supreme Court shall make such appointment; provided, however, that the term of such appointee shall be for the period prescribed for the appointment by the authority who was to have made the appointment but who failed to do so. If at any time there should be a vacancy on the commission, a successor member to serve for the unexpired term applicable to such vacancy shall be appointed by the same appointing authority as the member whose unexpired term such successor is to fill.

Any member of the commission who is indicted for any felony may be suspended by the commission from service on the commission. A commission member who is convicted of a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude or convicted of any felony shall be ineligible to serve and the member’s position on the commission shall be vacant and subject to reappointment as for other vacancies.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 508, § 3(1)-(5); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 488, § 3; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 348, § 3; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 491, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 360, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 350, § 3; Laws, 2008, ch. 562, § 2, eff August 5, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 25-4-7.
Organizational meeting of commission.

As soon as all of the initial members of the commission have been appointed, the Chief Justice of the Mississippi Supreme Court shall call and provide for the holding of an organizational meeting of the commission; provided, however, in no instance shall such meeting be set for less than forty-five (45) days nor more than sixty (60) days after November 15, 1979.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 508, § 3(6); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 488, § 4; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 348, § 4; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 491, § 4; Laws, 1995, ch. 360, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 350, § 4, eff from and after June 8, 1998 (date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the reenactment of this section).

§ 25-4-9.
Chairman and vice-chairman of commission.

The commission shall annually elect one (1) member to serve as chairman of the commission and one (1) member to serve as vice chairman. The vice chairman shall act as chairman in the absence or upon the disability of the chairman or in the event of a vacancy of the office of the chairman.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 508, § 3(7); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 488, § 5; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 348, § 5; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 491; Laws, 1995, ch. 360, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 350, § 5, eff from and after June 8, 1998 (date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the reenactment of this section).

§ 25-4-11.
Quorum; vacancy in commission.

Five (5) members of the commission shall constitute a quorum. Five (5) members of the commission shall vote in the affirmative before any official action can be taken by the commission. Execution of such official action may be delegated to the chairman or executive director of the commission.

A vacancy in the commission shall not impair the right of the remaining members to exercise all the powers of the commission subject to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 508, § 3(8)(9); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 488, § 6; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 348, § 6; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 491; Laws, 1995, ch. 360, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 350, § 6, eff from and after June 8, 1998 (date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the reenactment of this section).

§ 25-4-13.
Compensation.

Members of the Mississippi Ethics Commission shall, while serving on business of the commission, be entitled to receive as compensation a per diem, as is provided by law, not to exceed Three Thousand One Hundred Twenty-five Dollars ($3,125.00) annually, in addition to any actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the official duties of the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 508, § 3(10); Laws, 1980, ch. 560, § 6; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 488, § 7; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 348, § 7; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 491; Laws, 1995, ch. 360, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 350, § 7, eff from and after June 8, 1998 (date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the reenactment of this section).

§ 25-4-15.
Executive director; employees.

The commission shall appoint an executive director to serve at the pleasure of the commission. The executive director shall possess a high degree of professional competence and integrity. The executive director shall be responsible for the administrative operations of the commission and shall perform other such duties within its powers as may be delegated or assigned from time to time by regulations or orders of the commission. The commission, by and through its executive director, may employ the personnel necessary to properly discharge the duties and responsibilities of the commission, subject to budgetary limitations. Such personnel shall possess a high degree of professional competence and integrity in the area in which employed.

All employees of the commission shall be excluded from the provisions of Section 25-9-101 et seq., relating to the State Personnel System.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 508, § 3(11)(12); reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 488, § 8; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 348, § 8; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 491; Laws, 1995, ch. 360, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 350, § 8; Laws, 2008, ch. 562, § 3, eff August 5, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 25-4-17.
Duties of commission.

The commission shall, in addition to any other duties prescribed by law:

Prepare and publish a manual setting forth recommended uniform methods of accounting and reporting for use by persons required to file statements of economic interest pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

Prescribe forms for statements of economic interest required to be filed pursuant to this chapter and furnish such forms to persons required to file such statements of economic interest pursuant to this chapter;

Accept and file any statements or information voluntarily supplied by persons required to file statements of economic interest under this chapter that exceeds the requirements of this chapter;

Develop and maintain a filing, coding and cross-indexing system of statements of economic interest, complaints, responses and other actions undertaken by the commission pursuant to this chapter;

Make statements of economic interest which are required to be filed by this chapter available by means of the commission’s Internet Web site on or before January 1, 2010, as well as at the physical office location of the commission for public inspection and copying during regular business hours;

Preserve such statements of economic interest for a period of seven (7) years from the date of their receipt;

Establish rules and regulations in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter and to insure and maintain the confidentiality and integrity of the commission, its proceedings, investigations and findings, it being the intent of this chapter to promote high standards of competence and conduct by the commission and its staff, and to insure that all matters designated as confidential shall remain confidential; provided, however, that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the commission, in its discretion, from releasing information to the public relating to its findings, proceedings, or investigations, or from holding open meetings on nonconfidential matters;

Study the body of Mississippi criminal law pertaining to public officials and report its findings and recommendations in summary form to each regular session of the Legislature;

(i) Have the authority, in its discretion, to issue advisory opinions with regard to any of such standards of conduct set forth in Article 3 of this chapter. When any public official requests in writing such an advisory opinion and has stated all the facts to govern such opinion, and the commission has prepared and delivered such opinion with references thereto, there shall be no civil or criminal liability accruing to or against any such public official who, in good faith, follows the direction of such opinion and acts in accordance therewith unless a court of competent jurisdiction, after a full hearing, shall judicially declare that such opinion is manifestly wrong and without any substantial support. No opinion shall be given or considered if said opinion would be given after judicial proceedings are commenced.

All advisory opinions issued pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph shall be made public and shall be issued within ninety (90) days of written request. The request for an advisory opinion shall be confidential as to the identity of the individual making the request. The commission shall, so far as practicable and before making public, an advisory opinion issued under the provisions of this paragraph, make such deletions and changes thereto as may be necessary to ensure the anonymity of the public official and any other person named in the opinion;

Have the authority, in its discretion, to authorize the executive director to issue written opinions in regard to any standards of conduct set forth in Article 3 of this chapter.

1. Any written opinion of the executive director shall be based upon prior opinions issued by the commission or reported court decisions of Mississippi courts, is not binding on the commission, shall not be published, and shall be ratified or rejected by the commission at the next subsequent meeting of the commission.

2. If the commission ratifies the opinion, the requestor shall not be liable for funds described in the request for opinion, and the requestor shall enjoy the immunity from liability set forth in subparagraph (i).

3. If the commission rejects the opinion, the requestor shall not be liable for funds described in the request for opinion that are paid before receipt of notice that the opinion had been rejected by the commission.

Within ninety (90) days, issue advisory opinions, upon written request by any individual required to file a statement of economic interest under the provisions of Section 25-4-25, pertaining to the content of the statement of economic interest which such individual is required to file under the provisions of Section 25-4-27. When such an advisory opinion is issued pursuant to a complete and accurate request, then there shall be no liability, civil or criminal, accruing to or against the individual requesting such opinion who, in good faith, follows the direction of the opinion and makes disclosure in accordance therewith unless a court of competent jurisdiction, after a full hearing, shall judicially declare that such opinion is manifestly wrong and without substantial support. No opinion shall be given or considered if such opinion is given after suit is filed or prosecution begun. All requests for advisory opinions and all advisory opinions issued pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph shall be confidential and the commission shall not publicly disclose any advisory opinion issued or the fact that an advisory opinion has been requested or issued unless the individual requesting the opinion gives his permission, in writing, to the commission; and

Maintain an Internet Web site capable of supporting the public information access and filing capabilities required under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 508, § 4; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1982, ch. 488, § 9; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 348, § 9; Laws, 1988, ch. 546, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 491, § 9; Laws, 1995, ch. 360, § 9; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1998, ch. 350, § 9; Laws, 2008, ch. 562, § 4, August 5, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 25-4-18.
Opinions of Attorney General as to ethical situations concerning individual legislators.

The appropriate committee designated by the Senate or the House of Representatives of the State of Mississippi to deal with ethical matters of their respective body may request, in writing, an opinion from the Attorney General as to real or hypothetical situations concerning a member of their respective body, but only upon request of such member. The Attorney General shall issue his opinion, in writing, in response to such request.

When a request pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall have stated all the facts to govern such opinion and an opinion shall have been prepared and delivered with reference thereto, there shall be no liability, civil or criminal, accruing to or against the member requesting the opinion who, in good faith, follows the direction of the opinion and acts in accordance therewith unless a court of competent jurisdiction, after a full hearing, shall judicially declare that such opinion is manifestly wrong and without substantial support. No opinion shall be given or considered if such opinion is requested after suit is filed or prosecution begun.

All requests for opinions and all opinions issued pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be confidential and neither the Attorney General nor the committee shall publicly disclose any opinion issued or the fact that an opinion has been requested or issued unless the member requesting the opinion gives his permission, in writing, to the appropriate committee of his respective house.

The provisions of this section shall be supplemental and in addition to any other statute.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 488, § 10; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 348, § 10; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 491; Laws, 1995, ch. 360, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 350, § 10, effective from and after June 8, 1998 (date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the reenactment of this section).

§ 25-4-19.
Powers of commission.

The commission shall have the authority to do the following:

(i) Make investigations, as provided in Section 25-4-21, with respect to statements of economic interest filed pursuant to this chapter and with respect to alleged failures to file any statement of economic interest as required pursuant to this chapter;

Administratively impose a civil penalty as provided in Sections 25-4-29 and 25-4-109;

Request the assistance of the Attorney General, the Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review Committee, the Department of Audit and any other governmental agency or political subdivision in the conduct of any investigation in which a particular resource of an agency may be needed;

Administer oaths and issue and serve subpoenas upon any witness or for the production of documents before the commission, and such subpoenas may include a protective order requiring confidentiality of the subpoena, the subject matter, and any documents subpoenaed, and such subpoenas shall be enforced by the courts of this state;

Report when necessary, as provided in Section 25-4-21(e), to the Attorney General and appropriate district attorney;

Upon a complaint signed under oath by any person, including any member of the commission or its staff or referred to the commission by the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review, investigate, as provided in Section 25-4-21, any alleged violation of law by public officials or public employees;

Seek, in the name of and for the use and benefit of the State of Mississippi, or a political subdivision thereof, restitution or other equitable or legal remedies in civil law to recover public funds or property unlawfully taken, as well as any unjust enrichment, although not public funds, and to recover on bonds where the state or a political subdivision thereof is the beneficiary;

Employ an attorney or attorneys to:

Serve as a special prosecutor to assist the Attorney General or a district attorney; and

File actions to seek restitution or other remedies to recover funds as provided in paragraph (f) of this section;

Publish notices for posting in governmental offices that outline the jurisdiction and authority of the commission and the procedure for filing complaints and requesting opinions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 508, § 5; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1982, ch. 488, § 11; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 348, § 11; Laws, 1988, ch. 546, § 2; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 491, § 11; Laws, 1995, ch. 360, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 350, § 11; Laws, 2008, ch. 562, § 5, eff August 5, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 25-4-21.
Proceedings upon complaints.

Upon receipt of a complaint that complies with Section 25-4-19, the commission shall authorize a confidential investigation of the complaint. Upon completion of the investigation, the commission shall proceed as follows:

If the complaint concerns a public official in the legislative branch, the commission shall refer the complaint, confidentially, to the public official and to the appropriate committee of the House of Representatives or the Senate having jurisdiction over the ethical conduct of its members and employees.

If the complaint concerns a public official in the judicial branch, the commission shall refer the complaint, confidentially, to the public official and to the Commission on Judicial Performance or the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.

If the complaint concerns a public official in the executive branch or persons not covered in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, then the commission shall refer the complaint, confidentially, to the public official and to the head of the department or agency, if the person is in the executive branch, or, for other public officials, to the person about whom the complaint is filed.

The persons, committees or commission receiving complaints referred in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) shall have thirty (30) days within which to respond to the complaint.

After receiving the response to the complaint or, if no response is received after thirty (30) days from the notice of referral, the commission may, in its discretion, terminate the matter or proceed with an investigation as follows:

The commission may terminate any and all proceedings at any stage of its procedure upon a determination that an appropriate disposition of the matter has occurred.

If the investigation indicates probable cause for belief that a violation of law has occurred, the commission may set a hearing of the matter to be held in accordance with the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure and the Mississippi Rules of Evidence. After the hearing, the commission may order penalties as prescribed in this chapter. The commission may enroll its order as a civil judgment with the circuit clerk in the county of residence of the judgment debtor. The commission may enforce the judgment on behalf of the State General Fund in the same manner as prescribed for other civil judgments, after complying with subsection (2) of this section.

The commission may refer the complaint with any evidence gathered during the investigation to the Attorney General and to the district attorney having jurisdiction, with a recommendation that it be considered for presentation to the grand jury. The Attorney General and the district attorney shall report back to the commission within ninety (90) days as to what action was taken following receipt of the complaint and recommendations of the commission, including the intent of the Attorney General to seek further civil remedies and the intent of the district attorney to present such matter to the grand jury.

Any person aggrieved by a decision of the commission made pursuant to its hearing procedures may appeal de novo to the Circuit Court for Hinds County and execution of the commission’s decision shall be stayed upon the filing of a notice of appeal.

Civil actions taken by the commission shall not bar prosecutions for violations of the criminal law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 508, § 6; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 488, § 12; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 24; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 348, § 12; Laws, 1988, ch. 546; Laws, 1995, ch. 360, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 350, § 12; Laws, 2008, ch. 562, § 6, eff August 5, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 25-4-23.
Confidentiality of proceedings and records.

All commission proceedings and records relating to any investigation shall be kept confidential, except this requirement shall not be construed to interfere with the commission’s authority, pursuant to paragraph (g) of Section 25-4-17, paragraphs (d) and (f) of Section 25-4-19, and pursuant to Section 25-4-21, or when necessary for prosecutions of violations under Section 25-4-31.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 508, § 7; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 488, § 13; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 348, § 13; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 491; Laws, 1995, ch. 360, § 13; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1998, ch. 350, § 13, eff from and after June 8, 1998 (date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the reenactment of this section).

§ 25-4-25.
Persons required to file statement of economic interest.

Each of the following individuals shall file a statement of economic interest with the commission in accordance with the provisions of this chapter:

Persons elected by popular vote, excluding United States Senators and United States Representatives, to any office, whether it be legislative, executive or judicial, and whether it be statewide, district, county, municipal or any other political subdivision, with the exception of members of boards of levee commissioners and election commissioners;

Members of local school boards that administer public funds, regardless of whether such members are elected or appointed;

Persons who are candidates for public office or who are appointed to fill a vacancy in an office who, if elected, would be required to file under paragraph (a) of this section;

Executive directors or heads of state agencies, by whatever name they are designated, who are paid in part or in whole, directly or indirectly, from funds appropriated or authorized to be expended by the Legislature, and the presidents and trustees of all state-supported colleges, universities and junior colleges;

Members of any state board, commission or agency, including the Mississippi Ethics Commission, charged with the administration or expenditure of public funds, with the exception of advisory boards or commissions; provided, however, in order to fulfill the legislative purposes of this chapter, the commission may require, upon a majority vote, the filing of a statement of economic interest by members of an advisory board or commission;

Executive directors, heads, or members of any board, committee, commission or council of any of the following entities, by whatever name designated:

An economic development district established pursuant to Title 19, Chapter 5, Mississippi Code of 1972;

Any entity created pursuant to the Regional Economic Development Act, Title 57, Chapter 64, Mississippi Code of 1972;

Any county development commission established pursuant to Title 59, Chapter 9, Mississippi Code of 1972;

Any industrial council established pursuant to Title 57, Chapter 32, Mississippi Code of 1972; or

An airport authority established pursuant to statute or other legislative act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 508, § 8; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1982, ch. 488, § 14; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 348, § 14; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 491; Laws, 1995, ch. 360, § 14; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 350, § 14; Laws, 2008, ch. 562, § 7, eff August 5, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 25-4-27.
Contents of statement of economic interest.

Each person specified under Section 25-4-25 shall file a statement in accordance with the provisions of this chapter in the manner and format prescribed by the commission which shall be certified as to the accuracy and completeness of the information set forth to the best knowledge of the person submitting the statement. The commission shall develop a system of electronic filing for use by persons required to file a statement of economic interest. The commission shall implement the electronic filing system on or before January 1, 2010. Any person required to file with the commission shall file electronically on and after January 1, 2010. The statement shall include the following information for the preceding calendar year:

The name and mailing address of the filer;

The title, position and offices whereby the person is required to file;

All other occupations of the filer and his household members;

The names and addresses of all businesses in which the filer or a household member held a position, and the name of the position, if the person or a household member:

Receives more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) per year in income from the business;

Owns ten percent (10%) or more of the fair market value in the business;

Owns an ownership interest in the business, the fair market value of which exceeds Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00); or

Is an employee, director or officer of the business;

Any representation or intervention for compensation by a person specified under Section 25-4-25(a) and (d) for any person or business before any authority of state or local government, excluding the courts; provided, however, that this provision shall not apply where the representation involves only uncontested or routine matters. The statement shall identify the person represented and the nature of the business involved; and

The filing party shall list all public bodies from which he or a household member received compensation in excess of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 508, § 9; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1982, ch. 488, § 15; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 170; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 348, § 15; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 491; Laws, 1995, ch. 360, § 15; reenacted without change, Laws, 1998, ch. 350, § 15; Laws, 2008, ch. 562, § 8, eff August 5, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).

§ 25-4-28.
Disclosure of holdings of certain blind trusts not required under certain circumstances.

A public official or public employee who has an interest in a blind trust which meets the standards set forth in this section is not required to disclose the holdings of the blind trust, if those holdings are acquired by the trustee after the trust complies with subsection (2).

A blind trust shall comply with the following conditions:

The trustee of a blind trust shall be:

A bank, trust or brokerage company authorized to exercise fiduciary powers, an individual who is an employee of any such bank, trust or brokerage company, a law firm or an attorney;

A disinterested party other than the public official or employee’s spouse, child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, brother, sister, parent-in-law, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, aunt, uncle, first cousin, or the spouse of any such person;

Someone who is not a public official or public employee; and

Someone who has not been appointed to a public entity by the public official or public employee, or by a public official or public employee supervised by the filer.

The trustee shall be given complete discretion to manage the trust, including, but not limited to, the power to dispose of and acquire trust holdings without consulting or notifying the filer.

The trustee is prohibited from disclosing to the filer any information concerning the replacement holdings except for information required under this subsection or the minimum tax information which lists only the totals of taxable items from the trust and does not describe the source of individual items of income.

A copy of the trust agreement shall be filed with the commission within five (5) business days after execution, including an identification of the holdings placed in trust, a statement detailing the date of its creation, and the name and address of the trustee.

The trustee annually shall file with the commission a signed statement, under penalty of perjury, stating that he or she has not revealed any information to the filer other than as permitted under this section and that, to the best of the trustee’s knowledge, the trust is in compliance with this section.

The trustee and the public official or public employee shall not communicate about the blind trust, directly or indirectly, except in writing, and a copy of all such written communications shall be transmitted to the commission.

The blind trust may be revocable or irrevocable. If the trust is revoked during the period of the public official’s or public employee’s tenure in office, then the public official or public employee, within ten (10) business days, shall file a statement in accordance with Section 25-4-25 disclosing all of the assets of the trust at the time of its revocation.

A public official or public employee who had a blind trust prior to August 5, 2008, shall amend the terms of such trust if any of its terms fail to comply with this section. A public official or public employee who had a preexisting blind trust shall also comply with the disclosure requirements of paragraph (d). Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the disclosure of assets held in a preexisting blind trust except for the assets placed into the trust at the time of its creation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 562, § 9, August 5, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section).